District of Columbia statutes.
22-2803

Carjacking.

(a)

(1)

A person commits the offense of carjacking if, by any means, that person knowingly or recklessly by force or violence, whether against resistance or by sudden or stealthy seizure or snatching, or by putting in fear, or attempts to do so, shall take from another person immediate actual possession of a person’s motor vehicle.

(2)

A person convicted of carjacking shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 and be imprisoned for a mandatory-minimum term of not less than 7 years and a maximum term of not more than 21 years, or both.

(b)

(1)

A person commits the offense of armed carjacking if that person, while armed with or having readily available any pistol or other firearm (or imitation thereof ) or other dangerous or deadly weapon (including a sawed-off shotgun, shotgun, machine gun, rifle, dirk, bowie knife, butcher knife, switch-blade knife, razor, blackjack, billy, or metallic or other false knuckles), commits or attempts to commit the offense of carjacking.

(2)

A person convicted of armed carjacking shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 and be imprisoned for a mandatory-minimum term of not less than 15 years and a maximum term of not more than 40 years, or both. However, the court may impose a prison sentence in excess of 30 years only in accordance with § 24-403.01(b-2). For purposes of imprisonment following revocation of release authorized by § 24-403.01(b)(7), armed carjacking is a Class A felony.

(c)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person convicted of carjacking shall not be released from prison prior to the expiration of 7 years from the date of the commencement of the sentence, and a person convicted of armed carjacking shall not be released from prison prior to the expiration of 15 years from the date of the commencement of the sentence.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 811a
as added May 8, 1993, D.C. Law 9-270, § 2, 39 DCR 9223
Oct. 2, 1993, D.C. Law 10-26, § 2, 40 DCR 3416
June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-302, § 4(f), 47 DCR 7249
June 19, 2001, D.C. Law 13-313,§ 21(a), 48 DCR 1873
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 201(f), 60 DCR 2064
Eligibility for geriatric or medical parole, persons convicted under this section, see § 24-467.
Good time credits, exceptions pertaining to persons convicted under this section, see § 24-221.06.
This section is referenced in § 7-2508.01, § 24-112, § 24-221.06, and § 24-467.
1981 Ed., § 22-2903.
D.C. Law 13-302, in subsec. (b)(2), inserted the last two sentences.
D.C. Law 13-313, in subsec. (b)(2), substituted “40 years” for “45 years”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $5,000” in (a)(2) and for “not more than $10,000” in (b)(2).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(f) of Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-2, February 2, 2001, 48 DCR 2239).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(f) of Sentencing Reform Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-51, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4370).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 4(f) of the Sentencing Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-410, August 11, 2000, 47 DCR 7271).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(f) of the Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 13-462, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9443).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(f) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.